Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the State Department of Geology  and Mineral In-
dustries, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the General Fund, the amount of
$2,559,795 for operations of the department.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or  other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and fed-
eral funds for contract services,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not described
in this section, collected or received by the State Department  of Geology and Mineral In-
dustries, for the following purposes:
(1) Geologic survey......................... $ 1,325,690
(2) Mined land reclamation ............ $ 1,521,476
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$2,922,365 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from federal funds other than those described  in section 2 of this 2019
Act, collected or received by the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries by section 1, chapter  508,
Oregon Laws 2017, for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, is increased by $650,000.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 508, Oregon Laws 2017, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2019, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and federal funds for  contract services, but
excluding lottery funds and federal funds  not described in section 2, chapter 508, Oregon
Laws 2017, collected or received by  the State Department of Geology and Mineral Industries,
for mined land reclamation, is increased by $400,000.
SECTION 6. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5511 (SB 5511-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 29, 2019
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5511 (SB 5511-A) Page 2